Arkansas, session 2025, HB1800.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-6-217(g)(1) - (3), concerning the
creation of the Arkansas Ethics Commission and resulting from Initiated Act 1
of 1990, is amended to read as follows:
(g) The commission shall have the authority to:
(1) Under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201
et seq., promulgate reasonable rules to implement and administer the
requirements of this subchapter, as well as § 7-1-114 [repealed]; the
Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to
Voters, § 7-9-401 et seq.; § 19-11-718; § 21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure
Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, § 21-8-401 et seq., § 21-8-
601 et seq., § 21-8-701 et seq., and § 21-8-801 et seq.; § 21-8-901 et seq.;
*SSS067*
04-08-2025 16:49:13 SSS067

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/8/25 HB1800
§ 21-8-1001 et seq.; § 21-8-1101 et seq.; § 25-1-125; and Arkansas
Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30; and to govern procedures before the
commission, matters of commission operations, and all investigative and
disciplinary procedures and proceedings;
(2) Issue advisory opinions and guidelines on the requirements
of § 6-24-101 et seq.; § 7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), and (7); § 7-1-114
[repealed]; this subchapter; the Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives,
Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters, § 7-9-401 et seq.; § 19-11-718; §
21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local
Officials, § 21-8-401 et seq., § 21-8-601 et seq., § 21-8-701 et seq., and §
21-8-801 et seq.; § 21-8-901 et seq.; § 21-8-1001 et seq.; § 21-8-1101 et
seq.; § 25-1-125; and Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30;
(3) After a citizen complaint has been submitted to the
commission, investigate alleged violations of § 6-24-101 et seq.; § 7-1-
103(a)(1)-(4), (6), and (7); § 7-1-114 [repealed]; this subchapter; the
Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to
Voters, § 7-9-401 et seq.; § 19-11-718; § 21-1-401 et seq.; § 21-8-301 et
seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, § 21-8-
401 et seq., § 21-8-601 et seq., § 21-8-701 et seq., and § 21-8-801 et seq.;
§ 21-8-901 et seq.; § 21-8-1001 et seq.; § 21-8-1101 et seq.; § 25-1-125; and
Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30; and render findings and
disciplinary action thereon;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-6-218(a)(1), concerning citizen
complaints filed with the Arkansas Ethics Commission and resulting from
Initiated Act 1 of 1990, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Any citizen may file a complaint with the Arkansas Ethics
Commission against a person covered by this subchapter, by § 6-24-101 et
seq.; § 7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), or (7); § 7-1-114 [repealed]; the Disclosure
Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters, § 7-
9-401 et seq.; § 21-1-401 et seq.; § 21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for
Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, § 21-8-401 et seq., § 21-8-601 et
seq., § 21-8-701 et seq., and § 21-8-801 et seq.; § 21-8-901 et seq.; § 21-8-
1001 et seq.; § 21-8-1101 et seq.; § 25-1-125; and Arkansas Constitution,
Article 19, §§ 28-30, for an alleged violation of the subchapters or
sections. For purposes of this subdivision (a)(1), the Arkansas Ethics
04-08-2025 16:49:13 SSS067

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/8/25 HB1800
Commission shall be considered a citizen.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-6-218(b)(1)(A), concerning citizen
complaints filed with the Arkansas Ethics Commission and resulting from
Initiated Act 1 of 1990, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) Upon a complaint stating facts constituting an alleged
violation signed under penalty of perjury by any person, the Arkansas Ethics
Commission shall investigate the alleged violation of this subchapter or § 6-
24-101 et seq.; § 7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), or (7); § 7-1-114 [repealed]; the
Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives, Referenda, and Measures Referred to
Voters, § 7-9-401 et seq.; § 21-1-401 et seq.; § 21-8-301 et seq.; the
Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, § 21-8-401 et
seq., § 21-8-601 et seq., § 21-8-701 et seq., and § 21-8-801 et seq.; § 21-8-
901 et seq.; § 21-8-1001 et seq.; § 21-8-1101 et seq.; § 25-1-125; and
Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-6-218(b)(4), concerning citizen
complaints filed with the Arkansas Ethics Commission and resulting from
Initiated Act 1 of 1990, is amended to read as follows:
(4) If the Arkansas Ethics Commission finds a violation of this
subchapter; § 6-24-101 et seq.; § 7-1-103(a)(1)-(4), (6), or (7); § 7-1-114
[repealed]; § 21-1-401 et seq.; § 21-8-301 et seq.; the Disclosure Act for
Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, § 21-8-401 et seq., § 21-8-601 et
seq., § 21-8-701 et seq., and § 21-8-801 et seq.; § 21-8-901 et seq.; § 21-8-
1001 et seq.; § 21-8-1101 et seq.; § 25-1-125; or Arkansas Constitution,
Article 19, §§ 28-30, then the Arkansas Ethics Commission shall do one (1) or
more of the following, unless good cause be shown for the violation:
(A) Issue a public letter of caution or warning or
reprimand;
(B)(i) Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 7-6-202, 7-9-
409, 21-8-403, and 21-8-903, and 21-8-1105, impose a fine of not less than
fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than three thousand five hundred dollars
($3,500) for negligent or intentional violation of this subchapter; § 6-24-
101 et seq.; § 7-1-114 [repealed]; the Disclosure Act for Public Initiatives,
Referenda, and Measures Referred to Voters, § 7-9-401 et seq.; § 21-8-301 et
seq.; the Disclosure Act for Lobbyists and State and Local Officials, § 21-8-
04-08-2025 16:49:13 SSS067

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/8/25 HB1800
401 et seq., § 21-8-601 et seq., § 21-8-701 et seq., and § 21-8-801 et seq.;
§ 21-8-901 et seq.; § 21-8-1001 et seq.; § 21-8-1101 et seq.; § 25-1-125; or
Arkansas Constitution, Article 19, §§ 28-30.
(ii) A fine for violating § 7-1-114 [repealed];
shall not exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150).
(iii) The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall adopt
rules governing the imposition of such fines in accordance with the
provisions of the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.
(iv) All moneys received by the Arkansas Ethics
Commission in payment of fines shall be deposited into the State Treasury as
general revenues;
(C) Order the respondent to file or amend a statutorily
required disclosure form; or
(D)(i) Report its finding, along with such information and
documents as it deems appropriate, and make recommendations to the proper law
enforcement authorities.
(ii) When exercising the authority provided in this
subdivision (b)(4), the Arkansas Ethics Commission is not required to make a
finding of a violation of the laws under its jurisdiction.

Subchapter 11 —— Disclosure by Representatives of a Hostile Foreign
Principal

21-8-1101. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The voters, citizens, and policymakers of this state are
entitled to transparency in the political and propaganda activities of
organizations that may be controlled by or under the influence of foreign
countries hostile to the interests of this state and of the United States;
(2) In an increasingly globalized world, determining whether an
organization’s political and propaganda activities are funded by hostile
foreign interests is often difficult; and
(3) Legislation is needed to ensure the transparency necessary
to allow voters, citizens, and policymakers to evaluate whether political and
propaganda activities are funded by potentially hostile foreign actors.

04-08-2025 16:49:13 SSS067

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/8/25 HB1800
21-8-1102. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Foreign-supported political organization” means a political
party or a domestic partnership, association, corporation, organization, or
any other combination of persons that has, within the past five (5) calendar
years, received money or other things of value from a hostile foreign
principal or a representative of a hostile foreign principal and that engages
in political activity;
(2) “Hostile foreign nation” means the:
(A) People’s Republic of China;
(B) Russian Federation;
(C) Democratic People’s Republic of Korea; or
(D) Islamic Republic of Iran;
(3) “Hostile foreign principal” means:
(A) A government of a hostile foreign nation, a political
party of a hostile foreign nation, or any member of a political party of a
hostile foreign nation;
(B) A nonresident alien of a hostile foreign nation; or
(C) A partnership, association, corporation, organization,
or other combination of persons organized under the law of or having its
principal place of business in a hostile foreign nation;
(4) “Political activity” means an activity that is performed to
influence an agency or public official of this state, a local government
entity within this state, or the public within this state, with reference to:
(A) Formulating, adopting, or changing the policies or
laws of this state; or
(B) Electing or opposing a candidate for local or state
public office, not including campaign donations; and
(5) “Representative of a hostile foreign principal” means a
person:
(A) Who acts as an agent, employee, representative, or
servant, or otherwise acts at the order, request, or under the direction or
control of a hostile foreign principal;
(B) Whose actions are financed in whole or in part by a
hostile foreign principal; and
(C) Who engages in political activity.
04-08-2025 16:49:13 SSS067

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/8/25 HB1800

21-8-1103. Transparency in representation of hostile foreign
principals.
(a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, a person shall
not act as a representative of a hostile foreign principal unless the person
has filed a true and complete registration statement with the Secretary of
State as required by this subchapter.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who
becomes a representative of a hostile foreign principal shall file a
registration statement under oath with the Secretary of State within ten (10)
days of the person's becoming a representative of a hostile foreign
principal.
(3) The obligation of a representative of a hostile foreign
principal to file a registration statement, after the tenth day of becoming a
representative of a hostile foreign principal, shall continue from day to
day, and termination of status as a representative of a hostile foreign
principal shall not relieve the representative of a hostile foreign principal
from the obligation to file a registration statement for the period during
which he or she was a representative of a hostile foreign principal.
(b) The registration statement required under this section shall
include the following:
(1) The registrant's:
(A) Name;
(B) Principal business address;
(C) Other business addresses in the United States or
elsewhere; and
(D) Residence addresses, if any; and
(2) A comprehensive statement of the nature of the registrant's
business.
(c) A registered representative of a hostile foreign principal under
this subchapter shall update the registration statement required under this
section no less frequently than quarterly.

21-8-1104. Transparency in foreign-supported political organizations.
(a) No later than January 31, 2026, and each following year, each
foreign-supported political organization shall register with the Secretary of
04-08-2025 16:49:13 SSS067

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/8/25 HB1800
State and provide the following information:
(1) The name of the foreign-supported political organization,
its business address, and upon request the names, titles, and addresses of
all officers and directors of the foreign-supported political organization;
(2) If the foreign-supported political organization is
affiliated with or a chapter of a national organization, the name of the
national organization, its address, and the names and addresses of its
officers and directors;
(3) A detailed statement of any expenditures of money or other
things of value made by the foreign-supported political organization within
the prior calendar year to influence an agency or public official of this
state, a local government entity within this state, or the public within this
state, with reference to formulating, adopting, or changing the policies or
laws of this state or electing a candidate to local or state public office;
and
(4) A detailed statement of all money or other thing of value
received by the foreign-supported political organization from a hostile
foreign principal or a representative of a hostile foreign principal during
the prior calendar year.
(b) A foreign-supported political organization under this subchapter
shall update the registration statement required under this section no less
frequently than annually.

21-8-1105. Penalties for violation.
(a) Upon receipt of a complaint that a representative of a hostile
foreign principal or a foreign-supported political organization has failed to
comply with the registration and reporting requirements of this subchapter,
or upon his or her own determination, the Secretary of State may investigate
and assess penalties for the violation of this subchapter.
(b) The Secretary of State may assess the following civil penalties:
(1) For any violation of this subchapter, up to five hundred
dollars ($500) per violation; and
(2) For willful or repeated violations of this subchapter, up to
two thousand dollars ($2,000) per violation.

21-8-1106. Rules.
04-08-2025 16:49:13 SSS067

As Engrossed: H4/1/25 S4/8/25 HB1800
The Secretary of State shall promulgate rules to:
(1) Create and maintain registration statement forms as
described under this subchapter; and
(2) Implement this subchapter.

/s/McAlindon






























04-08-2025 16:49:13 SSS067